Massachusetts, session 194th, H2198.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 12 of Chapter 123 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
after the first paragraph in subsection (a) the following paragraphs:-
No person shall be involuntarily held for more than 72 hours at a facility that has not
been authorized by the department to perform evaluations under section 12(b). Any person held
longer than 72 hours must be released.
Any psychiatric hold lasting for more than 48 hours at a facility that has not been
authorized by the department to perform evaluations under section 12(b) must be referred to the
Committee for Public Counsel Services for appointment of counsel.
of 1